Utah statutes.
31A-1-109.   Name of licensee.

(1)  The name of any licensee who is not a natural person may not be the same as or deceptively similar to the name of any licensee existing under the laws of the state or licensee authorized to transact business in this state.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the department may authorize the use of a name that is deceptively similar to the name of a licensee described in Subsection (1) if the name requested is not identical with any name already on file and either:

(a)  the owner of the other name consents to the use with the department; or

(b)  the department is provided a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name in this state.

